District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.18

Existing agreements.

This chapter shall not serve as an amendment, alteration, modification, or repeal of any contract or any regional agreement to which the District government is a party, including the 1985 Blue Plains Intermunicipal Agreement.

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 218, 43 DCR 548
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-184, § 202(m), 43 DCR 4265
This section is referenced in § 34-2202.06.
1981 Ed., § 43-1688.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(m) of the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-293, July 9, 1996, 43 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(m) of the Water and Sewer Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-397, October 9, 1996, 43 DCR 5686), § 2(m) of the Water and Sewer Authority Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-466, December 30, 1996, 44 DCR 165), and § 2(m) of the Water and Sewer Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-48, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2105).